Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-505 Who may witness.
(a) An individual generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to
a will.

(b) The signing of a will by an interested
witness does not invalidate the will or any provision of it, including any gift
to or appointment of the witness. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next